nb: Tilkoblingstype for spenningsregulator: Flatstiftkontakter; Ledningsender (pigtail); Plug-in (OEM-ledningsnettplugg); Ringkabelsko (bolt); Skrueterminaler; Spadeterminaler; Annet
tr: Voltaj regülatörü bağlantı tipi: Bıçak terminaller; Pigtail kablolar (tel uçlar); Geçmeli (OEM kablo demeti konektörü); Halka terminaller (saplama); Vidalı terminaller; Çatal terminaller; Diğer
pt-BR: Regulador de tensão tipo de conector: Terminais de lâmina; Terminais pigtail (fios chicote); Plug-in (conector de chicote OEM); Terminais de anel (pino); Terminais de parafuso; Terminais tipo forquilha; Outro
de: Art des Spannungsregleranschlusses: Flachsteckanschlüsse; Pigtail-Kabel (Drahtkabel); Plug-in (OEM-Kabelbaumanschluss); Ringkabelschuhe (Bolzen); Schraubklemmen; Gabelkabelschuhe; Sonstiges
sv: Spänningsregulatorns anslutningstyp: Flatstift; Pigtail-kablar (kabelledare); Plug-in (OEM-kabelanslutning); Ringkabelskor (bult); Skruvplintar; Gaffelkabelskor; Övrigt
it: Tipo di connettore del regolatore di tensione: Terminali a lama; Cavi pigtail (conduttori a filo); Plug-in (connettore cablaggio OEM); Terminali ad anello (perno); Morsetti a vite; Terminali a forcella; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de conector do regulador de tensão: Terminais de lâmina; Terminais pigtail (fios condutores); Ficha (conector de cablagem OEM); Terminais de anel (pino); Terminais de parafuso; Terminais forquilha; Outro
es: Tipo de conector del regulador de voltaje: Terminales de cuchilla; Cables pigtail (cables de conexión); Enchufable (conector de arnés OEM); Terminales de anillo (perno); Terminales de tornillo; Terminales de pala; Otro
en: Voltage regulator connector type: Blade terminals; Pigtail leads (wire leads); Plug-in (OEM harness connector); Ring terminals (stud); Screw terminals; Spade terminals; Other
ko: 전압 레귤레이터 커넥터 유형: 블레이드 단자; 피그테일 리드(와이어 리드); 플러그인(OEM 하네스 커넥터); 링 단자(스터드); 나사 단자; 스페이드 단자; 기타
sk-SK: Typ konektora regulátora napätia: Ploché konektory; Pigtailové vývody (káblové vývody); Zásuvné (OEM konektor zväzku); Očkové konektory (svorník); Skrutkové svorky; Vidlicové konektory; Iné
ja: 電圧レギュレーターコネクタータイプ: 平型端子; ピグテールリード (ワイヤーリード); プラグイン (純正ハーネスコネクター); 丸型端子 (スタッド); ネジ式端子; クワ型端子; その他
hu: Feszültségszabályozó csatlakozójának típusa: Késes csatlakozók; Lengővezetékes; Dugaszolható (OEM-kábelkötegcsatlakozó); Gyűrűs csatlakozók (tőcsavaros); Csavaros csatlakozók; Villás csatlakozók; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип конектор на регулатора на напрежение: Плоски клеми; Кабели (свързващи проводници); Plug-in (Конектор за OEM кабелен сноп); Пръстеновидни клеми; Винтови клеми; Вилкови клеми; Друго
fi: Jännitteensäätimen liitintyyppi: Lattaliittimet; Johtimet; Pistoke (OEM-johtosarjan liitin); Rengasliittimet; Ruuviliittimet; Haarukkaliittimet; Muu
cs: Typ konektoru regulátoru napětí: Nožové konektory; Připojovací kabely; Zásuvný konektor (OEM konektor kabeláže); Očkové konektory (pro svorník); Šroubové svorky; Vidlicové konektory; Jiné
nl: Spanningsregelaar connector type: Vlakstekkers; Kabeluiteinden (draaduiteinden); Plug-in (OEM-kabelboomconnector); Ringklemmen (bout); Schroefklemmen; Vorkstekkers; Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka regulatorja napetosti: Ploščati priključki (blade); Žični vodniki (pigtail); Vtični (konektor originalnega kabelskega snopa); Obročasti priključki; Vijačni priključki; Viličasti priključki (spade); Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului regulatorului de tensiune: Terminale tip lamelă; Fire cu pigtail (cabluri de legătură); Plug-in (conector cablaj OEM); Terminale tip inel (tijă); Terminale cu șurub; Terminale tip papuc; Altele
zh-TW: 電壓調節器接頭類型: 刀片端子; 引線 (導線); 插頭 (原廠線束連接器); 環形端子 (螺柱); 螺絲端子; Y 型端子; 其他
zh-CN: 电压调节器连接器类型: 刀片式端子; 引线（导线）; 插入式（OEM 线束连接器）; 环形端子（螺柱）; 螺丝端子; 铲形端子; 其他
pl: Typ złącza regulatora napięcia: Końcówki wtykowe (płaskie); Złącza typu pigtail (przewody luźne); Wtyczka (złącze wiązki OEM); Końcówki oczkowe (na śrubę); Końcówki śrubowe; Końcówki widełkowe; Inne
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อตัวควบคุมแรงดันไฟฟ้า: ขั้วต่อแบบแบน; สายแบบ Pigtail (สายไฟนำ); ปลั๊กอิน (ขั้วต่อชุดสายไฟ OEM); ขั้วต่อแบบห่วง (สตั๊ด); ขั้วต่อแบบสกรู; ขั้วต่อแบบก้ามปู; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Regulator napona mehanizam sinkronizacije tipa: Plosnati terminali; Pigtail priključci (žičani priključci); Utični (priključak za OEM kabelski svežanj); Prstenasti terminali (svornjak); Vijčani terminali; Viličasti terminali; Ostalo
vi: Loại kết nối bộ điều chỉnh điện áp: Đầu cốt chữ nhật; Dây nối đuôi lợn (dây dẫn); Dạng cắm (đầu nối bộ dây diện OEM); Đầu cốt khuyên (có chốt); Đầu cốt bắt vít; Đầu cốt chữ Y; Khác
da: Stiktype for spændingsregulator: Fladstik; Ledningsender (wire leads); Plug-in (OEM-ledningsnetstik); Ringkabelsko (studs); Skrueterminaler; Spadestik; Andet
fr: Type de connecteur du régulateur de tension: Bornes à lame; Fils de raccordement (pigtail); Enfichable (connecteur de faisceau OEM); Cosses à anneau (goujon); Bornes à vis; Cosses à fourche; Autre
el: Τύπος συνδέσμου ρυθμιστή τάσης: Ακροδέκτες τύπου φις (blade); Ακροδέκτες με καλώδια (pigtail); Plug-in (σύνδεσμος πλεξούδας OEM); Κυκλικοί ακροδέκτες (μπουζόνι); Βιδωτοί ακροδέκτες; Ακροδέκτες τύπου δίχαλου (spade); Άλλο
ru: Тип разъема регулятора напряжения: Ножевые клеммы; Выводы в виде гибких проводов; Штекерный (оригинальный разъем жгута); Кольцевые клеммы (под шпильку); Винтовые клеммы; Вилочные клеммы; Другое
lt-LT: Įtampos reguliatoriaus jungties tipas: Plokštieji gnybtai; Lanksčių laidų išvadai; Įkišamas (OEM laidų jungtis); Žiediniai gnybtai (smeigtukai); Sraigtiniai gnybtai; Šakiniai gnybtai; Kita